Louisiana, session 2026, HB984.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1231.2(B)(1), 1231.3(D), and 1237.1(F)(introductory paragraph),
(2), (3), (6), and (7) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1231.2. Limitation of recovery
* * *
B.(1) The total amount recoverable for all malpractice claims for injuries to
or death of a patient, exclusive of future medical care and related benefits as
provided in R.S. 40:1231.3, shall not exceed five hundred seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars plus interest and cost.
* * *
§1231.3. Future medical care and related benefits
* * *
D. Payments for medical care and related benefits shall be paid by the
patient's compensation fund without regard to the five hundred seven hundred fifty
thousand dollar limitation imposed in R.S. 40:1231.2.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1476 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 984
§1237.1. Definitions and general application
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, no
judgment shall be rendered and no settlement or compromise shall be entered into
for the injury or death of any patient in any action or claim for an alleged act of
malpractice in excess of five hundred seven hundred fifty thousand dollars plus
interest and costs, exclusive of future medical care and related benefits valued in
excess of such five hundred seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. In claims which
may include future medical care and related benefits, the following procedures shall
apply:
* * *
(2) If the total amount of the value of the judgment or settlement or
compromise is for five hundred seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, plus interest
and costs, exclusive of the value of future medical care and related benefits, all
future medical care and related benefits shall be paid in accordance herewith with
this Subsection.
(3) If the total amount of recovery, excluding interest and costs but including
the amount of future medical care and related benefits does not exceed five hundred
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, judgment may be rendered for the total amount
and paid by the state as provided by Subsection I of this Section.
* * *
(6) If the total amount of recovery awarded against the state, excluding
interest and costs but including the amount of future medical care and related
benefits, exceeds five hundred seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, the claimant
may make a claim to the office of risk management for all future medical care and
related benefits.
(7) Payments for medical care and related benefits shall be paid by the office
of risk management pursuant to Subsection L of this Section, without regard to the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1476 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 984
five hundred seven hundred fifty thousand dollar limitation imposed in this
Subsection.
* * *